Wisconsin, session 2025, SB437.
do enact as follows:SB437,14Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 5insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB437,26Section 2. 20.437 (1) (bw) of the statutes is created to read:SB437,2,8720.437 (1) (bw) Automated external defibrillators in child care centers. 8Biennially, the amounts in the schedule for grants under s. 48.549.SB437,39Section 3. 48.549 of the statutes is created to read:SB437,2,141048.549 Automated external defibrillators in child care centers. (1) 11From the appropriation under s. 20.437 (1) (bw), the department shall award 12grants to child care centers licensed under s. 48.65 to provide automated external 13defibrillators and automated external defibrillator maintenance in the child care 14center.SB437,2,1615(2) To be eligible for a grant under sub. (1), a licensed child care center shall 16provide matching funds equal to at least 33 percent of the total grant amount.SB437,2,1817(3) The department shall award grants under sub. (1) in each child care 18licensing region designated by the department’s bureau of early care regulation.SB437,2,1919